Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 4. Land Quality

Law reviews. —

For article, “Strip Mining, the West and the Nation,” see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1977).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

53A Am. Jur. 2d Mines and Minerals §§ 225, 260, 340 to 348.

Tort liability for pollution from underground storage tank, 5 ALR5th 1.

58 C.J.S. Mines and Minerals §§ 335, 362 to 370, 379 to 383, 427 to 433.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
172.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 35-11-401.
Compliance generally; exceptions.

No mining operation or operation by which solid minerals are intended to be extracted from the earth shall be commenced after the effective date of the act, except in accordance with its requirements. It is recognized these measures are performed in the public interest and constitute an expense to the operator, and while this act applies to all mining operations, no operator shall be compelled to perform at his own expense measures required under this act with respect to operations that were completed or substantially completed prior to the effective date of this act. Nothing in this act shall provide the land quality division regulatory authority over oil mining operations as defined in W.S. 30-5-104(d)(ii)(F).

All surface or underground mining operations operating at the date of enactment of this statute shall have a period of one (1) year within which to fulfill the requirements of this act. This period may be extended at the discretion of the council if the administrator has been unable to review and evaluate all operations that are presently operating under a permit issued by the state land commissioner in compliance with the “Open Cut Land Reclamation Act of 1969”.

An operator presently operating under a permit issued by the state land commissioner in accordance and in full compliance with the Open Cut Land Reclamation Act of 1969 will be issued a permit upon submission to the administrator of:

The information, maps and other exhibits required by this act; and

A reclamation plan which fulfills all of the requirements of this act and is reviewed by the advisory board.

Within two (2) months following the final approval of a state program pursuant to Section 503 of P.L. § 95-87 [30 U.S.C. § 1253], all operators of surface coal mining operations operating under a permit issued in accordance with the terms of this act shall apply for a new mining permit covering those lands expected to be mined or reclaimed after eight (8) months from state program approval. Within eight (8) months from the date of state program approval, the administrator shall approve or deny an application for a surface coal mining permit. No person shall engage in or carry out surface coal mining operations unless the person has first obtained a permit pursuant to this section except as hereafter provided. A person conducting operations consistent with this act may continue operating beyond eight (8) months from state program approval if an application for a permit has been filed in accordance with this act but the administrator’s decision on the application has not been rendered.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to any of the following activities:

Building or expansion of utilities, soil conservation conveyances and foundation excavations for the purpose of constructing buildings and other structures not used in mining operations;

Excavations other than for the extraction of coal by an agency of federal, state or local government or its authorized contractors for highway and railroad cuts and for the purpose of providing fill, sand, gravel and other materials for use in connection with any public project if reclamation requirements of federal, state or local governments are consistent with all provisions of this act or regulations promulgated thereunder. Excavations for the extraction of coal as an incidental part of federal, state or local government financed highway or other construction shall be conducted in accordance with regulations established by the council;

The extraction of sand, gravel, dirt, scoria, limestone, dolomite, shale, ballast or feldspar by a landowner for his own noncommercial use from land owned or leased by him;

Archaeological excavations;

Other surface mining operations which the administrator determines to be of an infrequent nature and which involve only minor surface disturbances;

Limited mining operations, whether commercial or noncommercial, for the removal of sand, gravel, scoria, limestone, dolomite, shale, ballast or feldspar from an area of fifteen (15) acres or less of affected land, excluding roads used to access the mining operation, if the operator has written permission for the operation from the owner and lessee, if any, of the surface. The operator shall notify the land quality division of the department of environmental quality and the inspector of mines within the department of workforce services of the location of the land to be mined and the postal address of the operator at least thirty (30) days before commencing operations. A copy of the notice shall also be mailed to all surface owners located within one (1) mile of the proposed boundary of the limited mining operation at least thirty (30) days before commencing operations. The operator shall notify the land quality division of the department of environmental quality of the date of commencement of limited mining operations within thirty (30) days of commencing operations. Limited mining operations authorized under this paragraph are subject to the following:

That the affected lands shall not be within three hundred (300) feet of any existing occupied dwelling, home, public building, school, church, community or institutional building, park or cemetery unless the landowner’s consent has been obtained;

Before commencing any limited mining operations, the operator shall file a bond to insure reclamation in accordance with the purposes of this act in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) per acre, except for quarries for which the bond amount shall not exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000.00) per acre of affected land including roads used to access the mining operation. Within ninety (90) days after limited mining operations commence, the administrator may require the operator to post an additional bond per acre of affected land if he determines that such amount is necessary to insure reclamation. The operator shall post the additional bond not later than thirty (30) days after receipt of such notification;

After the limited mining operations have ceased, the operator shall notify the administrator of such fact in the operator’s next annual report and commence reclamation and restoration in compliance with the rules and regulations of the land quality division of the department of environmental quality. The rules and regulations for reclamation shall at all times be reasonable;

Immediate reclamation will not be required if the landowner advises the department in writing of his intent to further utilize the product of the mine, and if he assumes the obligation of reclamation;

The limited mining operations shall be terminated if the operator does not commence operations within five (5) years as noted in the annual report following notification to the land quality division of the department of environmental quality under this paragraph;

Limited mining operations may continue for not more than five (5) years from the date of commencing operations unless a notification to extend operations is submitted to the land quality division administrator. Operators shall submit a notification of extension for every subsequent five (5) year period with the annual report.

through (ix) Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 44, § 2.

In promulgating regulations to implement this section the administrator and director shall consider:

The nature of the class, type, or types of activities involved;

Their magnitude (in tons and acres);

Their potential for adverse environmental impact; and

Whether the class, type, or types of activities are already subject to an existing regulatory system by state or local government or an agency of the federal government.

A single permit may be issued to all county or other local governmental entities of the state to operate noncontiguous facilities in compliance with the statutes.

A single permit may be issued for mining of noncontiguous minerals deposits at the discretion of the administrator in compliance with the statutes.

The council, upon recommendation from the advisory board through the administrator and director, may modify or suspend certain requirements of W.S. 35-11-406(a), (b), (d), (f) and (g) by rules and regulations, for surface mining operations involving not more than thirty-five thousand (35,000) yards of overburden, excluding topsoil, and ten (10) acres of affected land in any one (1) year, if the application requirements insure reclamation in accordance with the purposes of this act. Roads used to access a mining operation permitted under this section shall be excluded from the annual ten (10) acres of affected land limit, but shall be included in the permit and bonded for reclamation liability.

An operator conducting operations pursuant to W.S. 35-11-401(e)(vi) shall file an annual report with the administrator on or within thirty (30) days prior to the anniversary date of the commencement date of initial operation. The report shall contain:

The name and address of the operator;

The location of the mining operations;

The number of acres of affected lands at the conclusion of the past year’s operation;

The number of acres of land that have been reclaimed during the past year;

The number of yards of overburden or mined mineral removed;

The expected remaining life of the mining operation.

No steep slope surface coal mining operation shall be commenced until the council has promulgated rules and regulations establishing steep slope mining performance standards.

In promulgating regulations to implement W.S.

35-11-401

and

35-11-402

, the administrator and director shall consider interim mine stabilization.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.20; Laws 1974, ch. 14, § 1; 1975, ch. 198, §§ 2, 3; 1976, ch. 15, § 1; 1977, ch. 108, § 1; ch. 132, § 1; 1980, ch. 64, § 2; 1983, ch. 35, § 1; 1987, ch. 211, § 1; 1992, ch. 60, § 3; 1993, ch. 39, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 40, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1; 2013 ch. 187, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2013 ch. 44, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2019 ch. 25, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (e)(vi).

The 2013 amendments. —

The first 2013 amendment, by ch. 44, §§ 1 and 2, substituted “Limited” for “Surface” in the beginning of the first sentence; substituted “fifteen (15)” for “ten (10)” following “an area of”, added “, excluding roads used to access the mining operation,” following “affected land”, substituted a period for “provided that” at the end of the first sentence, added “at least thirty (30) days” in the second sentence, added the last two sentences in (e)(vi); added (e)(vi)(A) through (e)(vi)(D); and repealed former (e)(vii) through (e)(ix).

The second 2013 amendment, by ch. 187, § 1, in (j), substituted “thirty-five thousand (35,000) yards” for “ten thousand (10,000) yards” and added “excluding topsoil” in the first sentence and added the last sentence.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (e)(vi), added the second to last sentence; in (e)(vi)(C), deleted “or within thirty (30) days after abandonment of the limited mining operation” preceding “the operator”, inserted “in the operator’s next annual report” preceding “and commence reclamation”; and added (e)(vi)(E) and (e)(vi)(F).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Open Cut Land Reclamation Act. —

The Open Cut Land Reclamation Act of 1969, referred to in the second sentence in subsection (b) and in the introductory language of subsection (c), was repealed by Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 3.

Applied

in

River Springs Ltd. Liab. Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 899 P.2d 1329,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976); Platte Dev. Co. v. State, Envtl. Quality Council, 966 P.2d 972,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1998).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Land Quality: The Regulation of Surface Mining Reclamation in Wyoming,” see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 97 (1974).

See article, “Federal Mineral Reservations,” X Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1975).

For article, “Accommodation or Preemption? State and Federal Control of Private Coal Lands in Wyoming,” see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 73 (1977).

For comment, “Hazardous Waste Cleanup in Wyoming: Legal Tools Available to the Private Citizen,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 395 (1984).

For case note, “Mining Law — Are Surface Lessees ‘Surface Owners’ Entitled to Protection of Consent and Bonding Provisions of Wyoming's Environmental Quality Act? Belle Fourche Pipeline Co. v. State, 766 P.2d 537,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1988),” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 447 (1990).

For case note, “Mining Law — Gravel Extraction — Is Control Over Small Gravel Mining The Best Road For Regulation?
River Springs Limited Liability Company v. Board of County Commissioners of County of Teton,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1995),” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 155 (1997).

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
200.02 (Matthew Bender).

§ 35-11-402.
Establishment of standards.

The council shall, upon recommendation by the advisory board through the administrator and the director, establish rules and regulations pursuant to the following reclamation standards for the affected areas, including but not limited to:

The highest previous use of the affected lands, the surrounding terrain and natural vegetation, surface and subsurface flowing or stationary water bodies, wildlife and aquatic habitat and resources, and acceptable uses after reclamation including the utility and capacity of the reclaimed lands to support such uses;

Backfilling, regrading or recontouring to assure the reclamation of the land to a use at least equal to its highest previous use;

A time schedule encouraging the earliest possible reclamation program consistent with the orderly and economic development of the mining property;

Revegetation of affected lands including species to be used, methods of planting and other details necessary to assure the development of a vegetative cover consistent with the surrounding terrain and the highest prior use standards set out in paragraph (i) of this subsection;

Stockpiling, preservation and reuse of topsoil for revegetation, unless it can be demonstrated to the satisfaction of the administrator that other methods of reclamation or types of soil are superior;

Prevention of pollution of waters of the state from mining operations, substantial erosion, sedimentation, landslides, accumulation and discharge of acid water, and flooding, both during and after mining and reclamation;

In administering established rules and regulations on such standards the administrator shall consider all the facts and circumstances bearing upon any reclamation plan. In consideration of reclamation plans for any mining operation that is presently being conducted in the state under a permit issued by the state land commission under the “Open Cut Land Reclamation Act of 1969”, particular attention shall be paid to:

The social and economic value of the product mined;

The technological availability for economic feasibility of reclaiming the affected area.

Establishing methods of estimating cost of reclamation which shall be computed according to established engineering methods;

Establishing procedures to obtain special license to explore by dozing. Such procedures will include but not be limited to method of application, location of proposed exploration, present use of affected lands, name of surface owner, proposed reclamation program, bonding requirement, and such other procedures as are necessary to insure that the exploration work will be conducted within the intent of this act;

Rules and regulations for the criteria for review and information and public notice requirements for permit revisions. A permit may be revised without public notice or hearing for revisions, including incidental boundary revisions to the area covered by the permit, if these do not propose significant alterations in the reclamation plan. Subject to applicable standards, any permit, except for surface coal mining permits, may be revised, in the permitted area, by identifying proposed alterations to the mining or reclamation plan in the annual report or addendum thereto, or by obtaining prior approval from the director, at the operator’s discretion;

Rules and regulations for conducting coal exploration operations which shall include prior notice of intention to explore, written approval by the director for the removal of more than two hundred fifty (250) tons of coal and reclamation provisions for new and existing operations in accordance with the reclamation standards governing surface mining;

Rules and regulations governing new and existing special bituminous surface coal mines as recognized in P.L. 95-87, which shall be controlling notwithstanding other provisions of this act to the contrary. The regulations shall pertain only to standards governing on site handling of spoils, elimination of depressions capable of collecting water, creation of impoundments and regrading to the approximate original contour, and shall specify that all remaining highwalls be stable. All other performance standards contained in this act shall apply to such mines;

Rules and regulations governing the use of decommissioned wind turbine blades and towers to backfill surface coal mining sites as part of an approved reclamation plan. Rules promulgated under this paragraph shall, at a minimum, provide for:

Minimum depth requirements for the burial of decommissioned wind turbine blades and towers to be buried below the surface and above any aquifers as defined in W.S. 35-11-103(h)(i). In setting depth requirements under this subparagraph, the council, administrator and director may consult standards for solid waste management facilities established by the solid and hazardous waste management division;

The removal of all mechanical, electrical and other materials from the decommissioned wind turbine blades and towers allowing only the base material of the blades and towers to be buried;

Disposal fees to be remitted to the department by the operator who allows disposal of decommissioned wind turbine blades and towers in surface coal mining sites, which shall be twenty-five percent (25%) of any revenues collected by the operator for the disposal of the decommissioned wind turbine blades and towers. The fees collected under this subparagraph shall be credited to the general fund;

The incorporation or amendment of any rules pertaining to solid and hazardous waste necessary to allow for the disposal of decommissioned wind turbine blades and towers in surface coal mining sites to be reclaimed.

Establishing such other rules and regulations necessary to insure full compliance with all requirements relating to reclamation, and the attainment of those objectives directed to public health, safety, and welfare;

Rules and regulations governing the use of inert material as backfill for non-coal mining sites as part of an approved reclamation plan. Rules promulgated under this paragraph shall, at a minimum, provide for:

Minimum depth requirements for the burial of inert material to be buried below the surface and above any aquifers as defined in W.S. 35-11-103(h)(i). In setting depth requirements under this subparagraph, the council, administrator and director may consult standards for solid waste management facilities established by the solid and hazardous waste management division;

Disposal fees to be remitted to the department by the operator who allows disposal of inert material in non-coal mining sites, which shall be ten percent (10%) of any revenues collected by the operator for the disposal of the inert material. The fees collected under this subparagraph shall be credited to the general fund;

The incorporation or amendment of any rules pertaining to solid and hazardous waste necessary to allow for the disposal of inert material in non-coal mining sites to be reclaimed.

To the extent federal law or regulations require approval by state wildlife agencies regarding surface mining lands to be reclaimed for fish and wildlife habitat, the Wyoming game and fish department shall consider fish and wildlife habitat to mean as defined in W.S. 35-11-103(e)(xxvi) and does not include grazingland as defined in W.S. 35-11-103(e)(xxvii), unless the grazingland has been designated as:

Critical habitat by the United States fish and wildlife service; or

Crucial habitat by the Wyoming game and fish department prior to submittal of the initial permit application or any subsequent amendments to the permit application.

For the reclamation of grazingland, native shrubs shall be used for reestablishment. No shrub species shall be required to be more than one-half (1/2) of the shrubs in the post-mining standard.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.21; Laws 1978, ch. 33, § 2; 1980, ch. 64, § 2; 1987, ch. 234, § 1; 1991, ch. 136, § 1; 1992, ch. 60, § 3; 1993, ch. 230, § 1; 1994, ch. 87, § 1; 1995, ch. 32, § 1; 2020 ch. 143, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 96, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (a)(xiii) and redesignated former (a)(xiii) as present (a)(xiv).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added (a)(xv).

State land preservation and enhancement account. —

Laws 2005, ch. 85, § 1, creates account for state land preservation and enhancement. The act appropriates $750,000 from the school foundation program account to the office of state lands and investments to be deposited in the new account. Funds in the state land preservation and enhancement account are to be used by the office of state lands and investments to fund projects that preserve and enhance the asset value of all surface and mineral lands held in trust by the state. The director of the office of state lands and investments is to report on the use and expenditure of the fund not later than October 1 of each year to the joint agriculture, public lands and water resources, joint education and the joint appropriations interim committees.

Laws 2005, ch. 85, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.

Federal reference. —

P.L. 95-87, referred to in the first sentence in subsection (a)(xii), appears mainly as 30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (a)(ix) and (a)(xii), see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Open Cut Land Reclamation Act. —

The Open Cut Land Reclamation Act of 1969, referred to in the second sentence in the introductory paragraph of subsection (a)(vii), was repealed by Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 3.

Application to preexisting operations. —

The reclamation requirements of this chapter apply to preexisting operations which were not completed or substantially completed prior to this chapter's enactment. Universal Equip. Co. v. State, 839 P.2d 967,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 35-11-403.
Powers of the administrator of land quality division.

The administrator of the land quality division shall have the following powers:

To utilize qualified experts in the field of hydrology, soil science, plant or wildlife ecology, and other related fields to advise on mining reclamation practices, and the adoption of rules. Advisors shall be reimbursed for travel and other expenses incurred in performance of official duties in the same manner and amount as state employees;

To fix the amount of, collect, maintain and otherwise comply with the statutory performance bond requirement set out in W.S.

35-11-417

. The council may order the forfeiture of a bond as set out in W.S.

35-11-421

;

To reclaim any affected land with respect to which a bond has been forfeited;

To recommend to the director, the issuance, denial, amendment, revocation and suspension of permits, licenses and special exploration licenses in accordance with the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.22; Laws 1992, ch. 60, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Application to preexisting operations. —

Both subsection (a)(ii) of this section and § 35-11-417(c)(ii) authorize the administrator to require a bond to ensure the reclamation of buildings and facilities existing prior to the enactment of this chapter. Universal Equip. Co. v. State, 839 P.2d 967,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 35-11-404.
Drill holes to be capped, sealed or plugged.

All drill holes sunk in the exploration for locatable or leasable minerals on all lands within the state of Wyoming shall be capped, sealed or plugged in the manner described hereinafter by or on behalf of the discoverer, locator or owner who drilled the hole. Prospecting and exploration drill holes shall include all drill holes except those drilled in conjunction with the expansion of an existing mine operation or wells or holes regulated pursuant to W.S.

30-5-101

through

30-5-204

.

“Person” means any person, firm, association or corporation who drills or is responsible for drilling holes for the purpose of exploration or development of these minerals.

“Plugging, sealing and capping upon abandonment” means any hole drilled shall be abandoned in the following manner:

“Plugging”. All artesian flow of ground water to surface shall be eliminated by a cement plug or other similar material sufficient to prevent such artesian flow;

“Sealing”. Drill holes which have encountered any ground water shall be sealed by leaving a column of drilling mud in the hole or by such other sealing procedure which is adequate to prevent fluid communication between aquifers;

“Surface Cap”. Each drill hole is to be completely filled to the collar of the hole or securely capped at a minimum depth of two (2) feet below either the original land surface or the collar of the hole, whichever is at the lower elevation. If capped, the cap is to be made of concrete or other material satisfactory for such capping. The hole shall be backfilled above the cap to the original land surface;

“Water Well”. If any holes drilled are to be ultimately used as or converted to water wells, the user shall comply with the applicable provisions of W.S.

41-3-911

through

41-3-938

;

“Surface Restoration”. Each drill site shall be restored as nearly as possible to its original condition, including reseeding if grass or other crop was destroyed.

Within sixty (60) days after the completion and abandonment of any hole drilled which has artesian flow at the surface, the person for whom the hole was drilled shall report the existence of the hole to the administrator, land quality division and the state engineer. The report, set forth in affidavit form, shall contain at least the location of the hole to the nearest two hundred (200) feet, the depth of the hole and estimated rate of flow, if known, and the facts of the plugging technique used.

Within twelve (12) months after the completion and proper abandonment of any hole drilled any person shall file with the administrator, land quality division and the state engineer a report which shall include the location of each hole, utilizing Wyoming state plane coordinates, and the depth of each hole drilled. The reports shall be confidential for a period of five (5) years from the date of filing. The period may be extended for additional five (5) year periods upon request of the person filing the report. When a report is no longer confidential pursuant to this subsection, the provisions of W.S.

35-11-1101

shall apply.

Where plugging reports are required to conform with federal regulations, and if such reports cover all the requirements of this section, they are adequate for the purposes described herein.

Except for drilling in conjunction with coal mining or coal exploration operations, the director in consultation with the administrator, land quality division, may waive any of the administrative provisions of this act pertaining to aquifers following a formal written application for a waiver of any particular provisions, if in the opinion of the director waiver of any such provisions shall not adversely affect the interests of the state of Wyoming and would create an undue hardship upon application. Waivers shall be in writing and may be appealed under the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

The drill hole should be capped immediately following the drilling and probing. If it is necessary to temporarily delay the capping or keep the hole open for any reason, the drill hole must be securely covered in a manner which will prevent injury to persons or animals.

Before drilling on lands within the state of Wyoming, any person conducting coal exploration operations shall give notice to the administrator which shall, at a minimum include a legal description of the area, the approximate number of holes to be drilled and a reclamation plan for proper abandonment in accordance with regulations promulgated by the council. This excludes drilling within an existing permit area approved prior to August 3, 1977.

Except as follows, any person who fails or refuses to comply with the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to imprisonment in a county jail for not more than ninety (90) days or a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both. Any person who drills in conjunction with coal mining or coal exploration operations in violation of this section or regulations promulgated pursuant hereto is subject to the provisions of W.S.

35-11-901

.

When exploratory drill holes have been abandoned in violation of these provisions, the director in consultation with the administrator, land quality division may then cause such holes to be capped, sealed or plugged and the state of Wyoming is granted a cause of action against the person refusing to comply with the provisions of this section for the recovery of the reasonable costs incurred by the director in having the holes properly capped, sealed or plugged.

All actions pursuant to subsection (k) or (m) of this section, must be initiated by the state of Wyoming within three (3) years of the date of the report required by subsection (d) of this section.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 140, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.22:1; Laws 1978, ch. 33, § 2; 1980, ch. 64, § 2; 1992, ch. 60, § 3; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2007, ch. 145, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (c)(ii), substituted “hole” for “hold.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (e) substituted “utilizing Wyoming state plane coordinates,” for “to the nearest forty (40) acre legal subdivision” following “the location of each hole”, in the second sentence substituted “The” for “Such”, “shall be” for “are”, inserted “for a period of five (5) years from the date of filing” and added the last sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 145, § 2, states as follows: “(a)
If the division receives a request for a release of any report filed prior to the effective date of this act, the division shall notify the person filing the report of the request for the release of the report at his last known address on file with the division.
If no objection is received by the division within thirty (30) days from the date of notification, the report shall be released. If an objection is received by the division within thirty (30) days from the date of notification, the report shall not be released.

“(b)
Not later than ninety (90) days following the effective date of this act, the division shall file notice of the provisions of this act in a newspaper of statewide distribution.
The notice shall contain provisions for any person who filed a report prior to the effective date of this act to request that the report be kept confidential according to the provisions of this act.”

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Quoted

in

People v. Fremont Energy Corp., 651 P.2d 802,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 386

(Wyo. 1982).

§ 35-11-405.
Permit defined; no mining operation without valid permit; when validity terminated.

A mining permit is the certification that the tract of land described may be mined by an operator licensed to do so in conformance with an approved mining plan and reclamation plan. No mining operation may be commenced or conducted on land for which there is not in effect a valid mining permit to which the operator possesses the rights.

A mining permit once granted remains valid and in force from the date of its issuance until the termination of all mining and reclamation operations, except as otherwise provided in this act.

All surface coal mining permits issued subsequent to approval of the state program pursuant to P.L. 95-87 shall be issued for a term of not to exceed five (5) years. If the applicant demonstrates that a specified longer term is reasonably needed to allow the applicant to obtain necessary financing for equipment and the opening of the operation and if the application is complete for this specified longer term, the director shall grant a permit for a longer term.

A surface coal mining permit shall terminate if the permittee has not commenced the surface coal mining operations covered by the permit within three (3) years of the issuance of the permit, except as provided in P.L. 95-87.

Any valid surface coal mining permit issued pursuant to this act is entitled to a right of successive renewal upon expiration with respect to areas within the boundaries of the existing permit if public notice has been given, any additional revised or updated information has been provided and the operation is in compliance with applicable laws and regulations and if the renewal requested will not substantially jeopardize the operator’s responsibility on existing affected land.

If an application for renewal of a valid surface coal mining permit includes a proposal to extend the mining operation beyond the boundaries authorized in the existing permit, the portion of the application for renewal which addresses any new land areas shall be subject to the standards applicable to new applications under this act. However, areas previously identified in the mining plan and reclamation plan of those surface coal mining operations not subject to the standards in W.S. 35-11-406(m)(xiii) [repealed] will not be subject to those standards in the renewal application.

An application for renewal of a valid surface coal mining permit shall be made at least one hundred twenty (120) days prior to expiration of a valid coal permit.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.23; Laws 1975, ch. 198, § 2; 1978, ch. 33, § 2; 1980, ch. 64, § 2; 1992, ch. 60, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

Section 35-11-406(m)(xiii), referred to in the second sentence in subsection (f), was repealed by Laws 1980, ch. 64, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Federal reference. —

P.L. 95-87, referred to in the first sentence in subsection (c) and in subsection (d), appears mainly as 30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.

Law reviews. —

See article, “Federal Mineral Reservations,” X Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1975).

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

For case note, “Mining Law — Are Surface Lessees ‘Surface Owners’ Entitled to Protection of Consent and Bonding Provisions of Wyoming's Environmental Quality Act? Belle Fourche Pipeline Co. v. State, 766 P.2d 537,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1988),” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 447 (1990).